src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON p_sur_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xn_ks_sg ;

LEXICON p_surmal_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xn_ks_sg ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: xn_ks_sg ;

LEXICON p_surplc_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xn_ks_sg ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xn_ks_sg ;


LEXICON p_plc_ks
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xn_ks_sg ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;

!LEXICON p3
!x3_sg ;

!LEXICON p4_plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: x4_sg ;



!! Consonant stems, odd and even stems

! Bern (even stem Berni- = p)
LEXICON p_plc_C +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_sg_1 ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;
LEXICON p_sur_C +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_sg_1 ;
LEXICON p_mal_C +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: p_sg_1 ;
LEXICON p_fem_C +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: p_sg_1 ;
LEXICON p_org_C +N+Prop+Sem/Org: p_sg_1 ;
!LEXICON p_ani_C +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: p_sg_1 ;
LEXICON p_obj_C +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: p_sg_1 ;

! London (odd stem Londoni- = 3p)
LEXICON p_plc_3C +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: p_sg_3 ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;
LEXICON p_sur_3C +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: p_sg_3 ;
LEXICON p_mal_3C +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: p_sg_3 ;
LEXICON p_fem_3C +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: p_sg_3 ;
LEXICON p_org_3C +N+Prop+Sem/Org: p_sg_3 ;
LEXICON p_ani_3C +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: p_sg_3 ;
LEXICON p_obj_3C +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: p_sg_3 ;


LEXICON p_sg_1 ! Bern
+Sg+All:%>ile K ;
+Sg+Ade:%>il^A K ;
+Sg: p_common ;

LEXICON p_sg_3 ! London
+Sg+All:%>ille K ;
+Sg+Ade:%>ill^A K ;
+Sg: p_common ;

LEXICON p_common
+Nom: K ; ! London
+Nom+Err/Orth:%>i K ; ! Beogradi
+Gen:%>in K ;
+Ill:%>hiin K ;
+Ine:%>iss^A K ;
+Ela:%>ist^A K ;
+Abl:%>ilt^A K ;
+Ade:%>itt^A K ;
+Tra:%>iksi K ;
+Ess:%>in^A K ;

LEXICON p_sur_nen
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: xnen ;

LEXICON p_org_nen
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: xnen ;

LEXICON p_plc_nen
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: xnen ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lainen:@U.Cap.Opt@%>l^Ai nen ;


!LEXICON p4_sur
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: x4_sg ;
