src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun !!≈ * @CODE@
Maas:Maa p_sur_ks ;
Fraas:Fraa p_sur_ks ;
Barsabbas:Barsabba p_sur_ks ;
Kirgisjalgadas:Kirgisjalgada p_plc_ks ;
Dundas:Dunda p_plc_ks ;
Laodikeas:Laodikea p_plc_ks ;
Elifas:Elifa p_sur_ks ;
Vegas:Vega p_plc_ks ;
Mindaugas:Mindauga p_plc_ks ;
Agulhas:Agulha p_plc_ks ;
Pinhas:Pinha p_sur_ks ;
Liias:Liia p_sur_ks ;
Mesopotamias:Mesopotamia p_plc_ks ;
Kupias:Kupia p_plc_ks ;
Caxias:Caxia p_plc_ks ;
Loijas:Loija p_sur_ks ;
Kirkas-Soljanen:Kirkas-Solja p_plc_nen ;
Patjas:Patja p_sur_ks ;
Leikas:Leika p_sur_ks ;
Loikas:Loika p_sur_ks ;
Karsikas:Karsika p_sur_ks ;
Hakkas:Hakka p_plc_ks ;
Lerkkanen:Lerkka p_sur_nen ;
Suokas:Suoka p_sur_ks ;
Silas:Sila p_sur_ks ;
Kaplas:Kapla p_sur_ks ;
Antiatlas:Antiatla p_plc_ks ;
Hermas:Herma p_plc_ks ;
Dumas:Duma p_sur_ks ;
Aquinas:Aquina p_sur_ks ;
Gáinnas:Gáinna p_plc_ks ;
Alagoas:Alagoa p_plc_ks ;
Troas:Troa p_sur_ks ;
Haapanen:Haapa p_sur_nen ;
Raipas:Raip2a p_plc_ks ;
Ainovarppanen:Ainovarppa p_plc_nen ;
Madras:Madra p_plc_ks ;
Epafras:Epafra p_sur_ks ;
Anaksagoras:Anaksagora p_plc_ks ;
Honduras:Hondura p_plc_ks ;
Laitanen:Laita p_sur_nen ;
Nattanen:Natta p_plc_nen ;
Pyhä-Nattanen:Pyhä-Natta p_plc_nen ;
Pietarlauttanen:Pietarlautta p_plc_nen ;
Kakslauttanen:Kakslautta p_plc_nen ;
Aguas:Agua p_plc_ks ;
Roivas:Roiva p_sur_ks ;
Korvanen:Korva p_plc_nen ;
Matanzas:Matanza p_plc_ks ;
Nordic:Nordic p_org_3C ;
Kjølstad:Kjølstad p_sur_3C ;
Hilfred:Hilfred p_mal_3C ;
Dagfrid:Dagfrid p_fem_3C ;
Kjellfrid:Kjellfrid p_fem_3C ;
Møyfrid:Møyfrid p_fem_3C ;
Sheffield:Sheffield p_sur_3C ;
Audhild:Audhild p_fem_3C ;
Ragnhild:Ragnhild p_fem_3C ;
Gunhild:Gunhild p_fem_3C ;
Torkild:Torkild p_mal_3C ;
Turisttrafikk-Forbund:Turisttrafikk-Forbund p_org_3C ;
Centralförbund+OLang/SWE:Central#förbund p_org_C ;
Sæmund:Sæmund p_mal_3C ;
Östersund+OLang/SWE:Öster#sund p_plc_C ;
Høygaard:Høygaard p_sur_3C ;
Edward:Edward p_mal_3C ;
Ingegjerd:Ingegjerd p_fem_3C ;
WinWord:WinWord p_obj_3C ;
Retfærd:Retfærd p_org_3C ;
Thorleif:Thorleif p_mal_3C ;
Kjærulf:Kjærulf p_mal_3C ;
Intereg:Intereg p_org_3C ;
Langang:Langang p_sur_3C ;
Rynning:Rynning p_mal_3C ;
Traneving+OLang/SWE:Traneving p_org_C ;
Zetterberg+OLang/SWE:Zetter#berg p_sur_C ;
Weberg:Weberg p_sur_3C ;
Ståhlberg+OLang/SWE:Ståhlberg p_sur_C ;
Älvsborg+OLang/SWE:Älvs#borg p_plc_C ;
KaraGeorg:KaraGeorg p_org_3C ;
Sakshaug:Sakshaug p_sur_3C ;
Sollaug:Sollaug p_fem_3C ;
Beth:Beth p_fem_3C ;
Duluth:Duluth p_sur_3C ;
Kaipiainen:Kaipi#ai p_plc_nen ;
Kupiainen:Kupi#ai p_sur_nen ;
Nousiainen:Nousi#ai p_plc_nen ;
Alhainen:Alhai p_plc_nen ;
Luukkainen:Luukkai p_sur_nen ;
Junnilainen:Junnilai p_sur_nen ;
Inarilainen:Inarilai p_org_nen ;
Ahvenainen:Ahvenai p_sur_nen ;
Oikarainen:Oikarai p_plc_nen ;
Vasarainen:Vasarai p_plc_nen ;
Valkeinen:Valkei p_plc_nen ;
Pekkinen:Pekki p_sur_nen ;
Kaskinen:Kaski p_plc_nen ;
Pielinen:Pieli p_plc_nen ;
Nieminen:Niemi p_sur_nen ;
Seitseminen:Seitsemi p_plc_nen ;
Inkeroinen:Inkeroi p_plc_nen ;
Pappinen:Pappi p_plc_nen ;
Kauppinen:Kauppi p_sur_nen ;
Lehtinen:Lehti p_sur_nen ;
Huittinen:Huitti p_plc_nen ;
Hätinen:Häti p_sur_nen ;
Joentekiäinen:Joentekiäi p_plc_nen ;
Sipiläinen:Sipiläi p_sur_nen ;
Isak:Isak p_mal_3C ;
Innsbruck:Inns#bruck p_plc_C ;
Frederik:Frederik p_mal_3C ;
Grunntrekk:Grunntrekk p_obj_3C ;
Årbok:Årbok p_org_3C ;
Stärkesmark+OLang/SWE:Stärkes#mark p_plc_C ;
Kvænsk:Kvænsk p_sur_3C ;
Etyk:Etyk p_org_3C ;
Bajábeal:Bajábeal p_obj_3C ;
Kusjal:Kusjal p_mal_3C ;
Journal:Journal p_obj_3C ;
Mabel:Mabel p_fem_3C ;
Rigel:Rigel p_org_3C ;
Esekiel:Esekiel p_mal_3C ;
Bredsel+OLang/SWE:Bredsel p_plc_C ;
Vidsel+OLang/SWE:Vidsel p_plc_C ;
Christel:Christel p_fem_3C ;
Egil:Egil p_mal_3C ;
Dispril:Dispril p_obj_3C ;
Kernell+OLang/SWE:Kernell p_sur_C ;
Blackwell:Blackwell p_org_3C ;
Nasafjäll+OLang/SWE:Nasa#fjäll p_plc_C ;
Kittelfjäll+OLang/SWE:Kittel#fjäll p_plc_C ;
Devdisfjäll+OLang/SWE:Devdis#fjäll p_plc_C ;
Hul:Hul p_sur_3C ;
Miriam:Miriam p_fem_3C ;
Joakim:Joakim p_mal_3C ;
Ängelholm+OLang/SWE:Ängel#holm p_plc_C ;
Söderholm+OLang/SWE:Söder#holm p_plc_C ;
Lapponicum:Lapponicum p_org_3C ;
Dominium:Dominium p_obj_3C ;
Vestrum:Vestrum p_sur_3C ;
Högström+OLang/SWE:Hög#ström p_sur_C ;
Kollström+OLang/SWE:Koll#ström p_sur_C ;
Söderström+OLang/SWE:Söder#ström p_sur_C ;
Deccan:Deccan p_org_3C ;
Verneplan:Verneplan p_obj_3C ;
Göran:Göran p_mal_3C ;
Fujisan:Fujisan p_org_3C ;
Finnmarksnevnden:Finnmarksnevnden p_obj_3C ;
Frihagen:Frihagen p_org_3C ;
Fangen:Fangen p_sur_3C ;
Befolkningen:Befolkningen p_obj_3C ;
Konungsbalken:Konungsbalken p_obj_3C ;
Älvdalen+OLang/SWE:Älv#dalen p_plc_3C ;
Ellen:Ellen p_fem_3C ;
Husflidskolen:Husflidskolen p_org_3C ;
Midgardsormen:Midgardsormen p_ani_3C ;
Volumen:Volumen p_obj_3C ;
Reinbeitekommisjonen:Reinbeitekommisjonen p_obj_3C ;
Botnen:Botnen p_sur_C ;
Brunen:Brunen p_ani_3C ;
Globaliseren:Globaliseren p_obj_3C ;
Lövgren+OLang/SWE:Löv#gren p_sur_C ;
Pladsen:Pladsen p_sur_3C ;
Natursstyrelsen+OLang/SWE:Naturs#styrelsen p_plc_C ;
Pilsen:Pilsen p_sur_3C ;
Magnussen:Magnussen p_sur_3C ;
Svarten:Svarten p_ani_3C ;
Tingretten:Tingretten p_obj_3C ;
Fenrisulven:Fenrisulven p_ani_3C ;
Piteälven+OLang/SWE:Pite#älven p_plc_3C ;
Gråen:Gråen p_ani_3C ;
Stein:Stein p_mal_3C ;
Virgin:Virgin p_org_3C ;
Malin+OLang/SWE:Malin p_fem_C ;
Hagelin:Hagelin p_sur_3C ;
Kathrin:Kathrin p_fem_3C ;
Sevetin:Sevetin p_org_C ;
Länsmann+OLang/SWE:Läns#mann p_sur_C ; ! sma:BERN,sme:BERN, smj:?
Reidunn:Reidunn p_fem_3C ;
Appollon:Appollon p_mal_3C ;
Shannon:Shannon p_fem_3C ;
Fredriksson+OLang/SWE:Fredriksson p_mal_C ;
Mickelsson+OLang/SWE:Mickelsson p_sur_C ;
Simonsson:Simonsson p_sur_3C ;
Neptun:Neptun p_obj_3C ;
Älvsbyn+OLang/SWE:Älvs#byn p_plc_C ;
Ellán:Ellán p_fem_3C ;
Tärnasjön+OLang/SWE:Tärna#sjön p_plc_C ;
Flyggsjön+OLang/SWE:Flygg#sjön p_plc_C ;
Agabos:Agabo p_surplc_ks ;
Nurhonen:Nurho p_sur_nen ;
Tirkkonen:Tirkko p_sur_nen ;
Lehmonen:Lehmo p_sur_nen ;
Jumpponen:Jumppo p_sur_nen ;
Mehtonen:Mehto p_sur_nen ;
Træplantingsselskap:Træplantingsselskap p_org_3C ;
Porocup:Porocup p_obj_C ;
Aleksandar:Aleksandar p_mal_3C ;
Kuningatar:Kuningatar p_fem_C ;
Aleksandr:Aleksandr p_mal_3C ;
Leer:Leer p_sur_3C ;
Hindseter:Hindseter p_sur_3C ;
Likestillingsenter:Likestillingsenter p_obj_3C ;
Elinor:Elinor p_fem_3C ;
Astor:Astor p_mal_3C ;
Brännkärr+OLang/SWE:Brännkärr p_sur_C ;
Las:Las p_sur_C ;
Hølaas:Høl#aas p_sur_C ;
Sunnaas:Sunn#aas p_sur_C ;
Vesaas:Ves#aas p_sur_C ;
Løvaas:Løv#aas p_sur_C ;
Adjagas:Adjagas p_org_C ; ! sub?
Korkiakangas:Korkia#kangas p_plc_3C ;
Ylikangas:Yli#kangas p_plc_3C ;
Mastokangas:Masto#kangas p_plc_3C ;
Mads:Mads p_mal_C ;
Härads:Härads p_plc_C ;
Akranes:Akra#nes p_plc_3C ;
Trondenes:Tronde#nes p_plc_3C ;
Eikenes:Eike#nes p_plc_3C ;
Anaksimenes:Anaksime#nes p_plc_3C ;
Drivenes:Drive#nes p_plc_3C ;
Kvalnes:Kval#nes p_plc_3C ;
Kaldfarnes:Kaldfar#nes p_plc_3C ;
Tømmernes:Tømmer#nes p_plc_3C ;
Pirnes:Pir#nes p_sur_3C ;
Lindesnes:Lindes#nes p_plc_3C ;
Tittelsnes:Tittels#nes p_plc_3C ;
Flatnes:Flat#nes p_plc_3C ;
Lakselvnes:Lakselv#nes p_plc_3C ;
Jöns+OLang/SWE:Jöns p_mal_C ;
Preuss:Preuss p_sur_C ;
Nyhuus:Ny#huus p_sur_C ;
Niitselys:Niitselys p_plc_C ;
Kolttaköngäs+Err/Orth:Koltta#kängäs p_plc_3C ;
Grågås:Gråg#ås p_plc_3C ;
Storås:Stor#ås p_plc_3C ;
Villat:Villat p_org_3C ;
Basemat:Basemat p_obj_3C ;
Friluftsfrämjandet+OLang/SWE:Fri#lufts#främjandet p_org_C ;
SRUSamerettsutvalget:SRUSamerettsutvalget p_org_3C ;
Salsbruket:Salsbruket p_org_3C ;
Beret:Beret p_fem_3C ;
Nationaltheatret:Nationaltheatret p_obj_3C ;
Lantbruksuniversitet+OLang/SWE:Lant#bruks#universitet p_obj_C ;
Skåningsbukt:Skåningsbukt p_sur_3C ;
Salt:Salt p_org_3C ;
PostScript:PostScript p_obj_3C ;
Runebert+OLang/SWE:Runebert p_sur_C ;
Norbert:Norbert p_mal_3C ;
Nyqvist+OLang/SWE:Ny#qvist p_sur_C ;
Britt:Britt p_fem_3C ;
Språknytt:Språknytt p_obj_3C ;
Ruut:Ruut p_fem_C ;
Afzelius:Afzeliu p_sur_ks ;
Arcturus:Arcturu p_surmal_ks ;
Kettunen:Kettu p_sur_nen ;
Luleälv+OLang/SWE:Lule#älv p_plc_C ;
Öreälv+OLang/SWE:Öre#älv p_plc_C ;
Lainioälv+OLang/SWE:Lainio#älv p_plc_C ;
Nyyssönen:Nyyssö p_sur_nen ;
